Maine, session 132, LD2115.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §1310-B-1, as amended by PL 2021, c. 641, §§6 to 8, is further
amended to read:
§1310-B-1. Land Application Contaminant Monitoring Well Contamination
Response Fund
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Fund" means the Land Application Contaminant Monitoring Well Contamination
Response Fund under subsection 2.
B. "Perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances" or "PFAS" has the same meaning
as in Title 32 38, section 1732 1614, subsection 5‑A 1, paragraph F.
2. Land Application Contaminant Monitoring Well Contamination Response
Fund. The Land Application Contaminant Monitoring Well Contamination Response
Fund is established to be used by the department as a nonlapsing, revolving fund to test and
monitor soil and groundwater private drinking water wells for PFAS and other
contaminants and for other related activities, including, but not limited to, abating,
remediating or mitigating identified contamination and the effects of such contamination
through the provision of access to safe drinking water, the installation and maintenance of
filter treatment systems, connection to local water district networks, the provision of bottled
drinking water or other actions.
A. The fund may accept revenue from any source, public or private, that may be
available for carrying out the purposes of the fund. The department shall deposit with
the Treasurer of State to the credit of the fund money in the fund not currently needed
by the department to carry out the purposes of the fund, which may be invested as
provided by law. Interest earned on investment of money under this paragraph must
be credited to the fund.
B. The department may transfer money in the fund in excess of the amounts the
department anticipates to be necessary to carry out the purposes of the fund to the
Uncontrolled Sites Fund under section 1364, subsection 6 for the purposes of testing,
monitoring or treating land contaminated by PFAS.
C. Beginning January 15, 2023 2027, and every 2 years thereafter, the department shall
submit a report to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction
over environment and natural resources matters regarding the uses of the fund and a
summary of contamination identified. After reviewing the report, the joint standing
committee may report out legislation related to the report.
4. Rules. The board may adopt rules necessary for the administration of the fund and
any underlying program or purpose under or funded by the fund. Rules adopted by the
board must include provisions for determining the eligibility of private drinking water wells
impacted by hazardous substances, including PFAS, for funding for testing, remediation,
the installation and maintenance of filter treatment systems, connection to local water
district networks and the provision of bottled drinking water regardless of when the testing,
remediation, installation or maintenance, connection or provision occurred. Under the
rules, funding appropriated for private drinking water wells must be prioritized based on
Page 1 - 132LR2820(01)

414 the proximity of the well to a discharge of a hazardous substance or landfill leachate or to
425 the spreading of sludge. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical
436 rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION, DEPARTMENT OF
Land Application Contaminant Monitoring Fund Z325
Initiative: Transfers funding in the Land Application Contaminant Monitoring Fund within
the Department of Environmental Protection to the newly created Well Contamination
Response Fund in the same department to reflect a change in fund name.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other ($500) ($500)
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL ($500) ($500)
1151 Well Contamination Response Fund N560
Initiative: Transfers funding in the Land Application Contaminant Monitoring Fund within
the Department of Environmental Protection to the newly created Well Contamination
Response Fund in the same department to reflect a change in fund name.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
2139 Well Contamination Response Fund N560
Initiative: Provides funding for private drinking water wells impacted by hazardous
substances, including perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances. Funding may be used
for testing, remediation, the installation and maintenance of filter treatment systems,
connection to local water district networks and the provision of bottled drinking water.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $1,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $1,000,000
3228
ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION,
DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27

GENERAL FUND $0 $1,000,000
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $0 $0
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $0 $1,000,000
Page 2 - 132LR2820(01)